District of Columbia statutes.
1-1308

Records deemed property of District; transfer of records upon vacancy in office.

All papers, plats, books, maps, and records of his office shall be deemed the property of the District of Columbia, and shall constitute a part of the public records; and in all cases of vacancy in the office, by resignation or otherwise, they shall be transferred to his successor in office.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1427, ch. 854, § 1600
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 545, ch. 1329
1981 Ed., § 1-908.
1973 Ed., § 1-608.